Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1793.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 16-1025 and 16-1026, to read: START_STATUTE16-1025. Electronic voting system components; security; video monitoring A. This state, a county or any other political subdivision of this state may not create, allow any person to create or disclose to any person an image of the hard drive of any electronic voting system component without the express permission of the officer in charge of the election. B. The officer in charge of elections or the officer's designee shall keep all electronic voting system components in a location where entry is controlled by use of a key card access system and shall maintain the entry log created by the system as an official election record for twenty-four months following the date of any entry. This subsection does not apply when electronic voting system components are deployed for use or stored at a voting location. C. The officer in charge of elections shall maintain video monitoring of all electronic voting system components. The video monitoring shall be of a type that continuously records a designated location or uses motion detection that records one frame per minute until detection of motion triggers continuous recording. If the video monitoring is disrupted or disabled, the officer in charge of elections is not liable for the disruption but shall attempt to reinstate video monitoring as soon as is practicable.  Any disruption in video monitoring may not affect or prevent the continued use or application of the electronic voting system components.  The officer in charge of elections shall maintain the video recording as an official election record for twenty-four months following the date the video is captured.  This subsection does not apply when electronic voting system components are deployed for use or stored at a voting location. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE16-1026. Electronic voting system; authorized access; violation; classification A. It is unlawful for a person to access without authorization from the officer in charge of elections, tamper with or facilitate unauthorized access to or tamper with any electronic voting system component, electromechanical voting equipment or election results reporting system. B. It is unlawful for a person to knowingly publish or cause to be published passwords or other confidential information relating to an electronic voting system.  In addition to any other remedies and penalties provided by law, the officer in charge of elections shall immediately revoke the authorized access rights of any person who violates this subsection. C. This section does not apply to authorized vulnerability disclosure programs or other programs authorized by the officer in charge of elections to verify and ensure the security of the electronic voting system. D. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE